New Mexico, session 2026, HB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of transportation for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2029 for acquisition of rights of way, planning, design and construction and to match federal and other state funds for the second phase of road infrastructure project 1101841 on United States highway 180 to expand the highway from two lanes to four lanes between the city of Bayard and the city of Deming. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund.